New York, session 2025-2026, A2426.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 6 of section 2999-i of the 2 public health law, as amended by section 2 of part K of chapter 57 of 3 the laws of 2019, is amended and a new paragraph (e) is added to read as 4 follows: 5 (d) The suspension of enrollment pursuant to paragraph (a) of this 6 subdivision shall not impact payment under the fund for any qualified 7 plaintiffs already enrolled in the fund for the remainder of the quali- 8 fied plaintiff's life. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or 9 regulation to the contrary, the fund account is authorized to maintain 10 payments for qualified plaintiffs already enrolled in the fund for the 11 entire state fiscal year even if total expenditures exceed available 12 appropriation authority. 13 (e) Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 14 contrary, on or after April first, two thousand twenty-five and annually 15 thereafter, the state comptroller shall transfer money from the state 16 treasury into the fund account in an amount which shall be sufficient to 17 avoid suspension of new enrollment for the entire state fiscal year. 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the contra- 19 ry, any appropriation or appropriations in the enacted state budget that 20 authorizes disbursement of funds from the fund account shall increase by 21 an amount that is equal to the amount necessary to support such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04788-01-5 A. 2426 2 1 disbursement of money in the fund account that will avoid suspension of 2 new enrollment for the entire state fiscal year. 3 § 2. Section 5 of chapter 517 of the laws of 2016, amending the public 4 health law relating to payments from the New York state medical indem- 5 nity fund, as amended by chapter 112 of the laws of 2023, is amended to 6 read as follows: 7 § 5. This act shall take effect on the forty-fifth day after it shall 8 have become a law, provided that the amendments to subdivision 4 of 9 section 2999-j of the public health law made by section two of this act 10 shall take effect on June 30, 2017 [and shall expire and be deemed 11 repealed December 31, 2025]. 12 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and be deemed to have been 13 in full force and effect on April 1, 2025; provided however, paragraph 14 (e) of subdivision 6 of section 2999-i of the public health law, as 15 added by section one of this act, shall expire and be deemed repealed on 16 March 31, 2027.